Washington statutes.
RCW 46.04.340

Muffler.

"Muffler" means a device consisting of a series of chambers, or other mechanical designs for the purpose of receiving exhaust gas from an internal combustion engine and effective in reducing noise resulting therefrom.

[ 1961 c 12 s 46.04.340. Prior: 1959 c 49 s 35; prior: 1937 c 189 s 1, part; RRS s 6360-1, part.]